Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 111
School Waste Recycling and Refuse Disposal

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 345, § 1, effective September 1, 2021.

16-111-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter.

“Educational entity” or “educational entities” means all Rhode Island school districts, including a single school district, regional school district, multiple school districts, any public or private school grades kindergarten through twelve (K-12), any charter public school, or any career and technical high school.

“Waste audit” means an analysis of a facility’s waste stream. The audit can identify what types of recyclable materials and waste a facility generates; how much of each category is recovered for recycling or discarded; and what materials can be composted.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 344, § 1, effective September 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 345, § 1, effective September 1, 2021.

16-111-2.
Waste audit/report.

On or after January 1, 2022, and every three (3) years thereafter, every educational entity shall coordinate and cooperate with the Rhode Island resource recovery corporation (RIRRC) for the purpose of conducting school waste audits. These audits shall produce waste management reports that shall be collected, maintained, and delivered to the educational entity. The waste audits shall be performed at every educational entity.

Waste audits and any reports required herein shall include guidelines and strategies on reducing waste for each educational entity to incorporate into its food waste reduction and recycling programs in an effort to eliminate food waste, promote recycling, and provide food to local communities.

Educational entities, using the guidelines and strategies pursuant to subsection (b), shall design and implement a waste collection system in accordance with applicable state law for the diversion of items including, but not limited to, paper, books, furniture, computers, office supplies, plastic, glass, cardboard, and surplus foods.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any waste audit conducted pursuant to this section shall be provided free of charge by the RIRRC.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 344, § 1, effective September 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 345, § 1, effective September 1, 2021.

16-111-3.
Food service and refuse disposal.

It shall be the policy of the state, the department of education, and any educational entity to require that any request for proposal (RFP) to select a food service company (vendor) to provide food services to an educational entity shall include, as part of its proposal, assurances that the vendor is in compliance with all laws relative to recycling and composting pursuant to chapter 18.9 of title 23; provided that, food waste is separated for diversion within that educational entity.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 344, § 1, effective September 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 345, § 1, effective September 1, 2021.

16-111-4.
Food service — Local sources preferred.

It shall be the policy of the state, the department of education, and any educational entity to encourage that any request for proposal (RFP) to a food service company (vendor) to provide food services to an educational entity encourage the use of a vendor that purchases ten percent (10%) of the required food service product from a Rhode Island-based food service company. In addition, it shall also be the policy of the state, the department of education, and any educational entity, to encourage the use of vendors who recycle organic-waste materials at an authorized composting facility, an anaerobic digestion facility, or by another authorized recycling method, regardless of whether the entity purchasing the services is or is not an educational entity, or a covered entity or a covered educational institution pursuant to the provisions of §

23-18.9-7

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 344, § 1, effective September 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 345, § 1, effective September 1, 2021.

16-111-5.
Food donations by food service companies.

It shall be the policy of the state, the department of education, and any educational entity to require that any request for proposal (RFP) to select a food service company (vendor) to provide food services to an educational entity shall require the vendor to donate any unserved nonperishable or unspoiled perishable food to local food banks or the Rhode Island Food Bank in accordance with the recommendations from the Rhode Island department of health “The Road to End Hunger” initiative.

Vendors required to donate nonperishable and unspoiled perishable food to local food banks or the Rhode Island Food Bank shall initially make arrangements for the provision accommodations necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

Except for injury resulting from gross negligence or intentional misconduct in the preparation or handling of donated food, no educational entity, person, or vendor who or that donates food that is fit for human consumption at the time it was donated, as required by subsection (a), shall be liable for any damage or injury resulting from the consumption of the donated food.

The immunity from civil liability provided by this section applies regardless of compliance with any laws, regulations, or ordinances regulating the packaging or labeling of food, and regardless of compliance with any laws, regulations, or ordinances regulating the storage or handling of the food by the donee after the donation of the food. The donation of nonperishable food that is fit for human consumption but that has exceeded the labeled shelf life date recommended by the manufacturer is protected pursuant to this section. The donation of perishable food that is fit for human consumption but that has exceeded the labeled shelf life date recommended by the manufacturer is protected pursuant to this section if the person who distributes the food to the end recipient makes a good faith evaluation that the food to be donated is wholesome.

The local food bank or Rhode Island Food Bank that, in good faith, receives and distributes food without charge, pursuant to subsection (a), that is fit for human consumption at the time it was distributed is not liable for any injury or death due to the food unless the injury or death is a direct result of the gross negligence or intentional misconduct of the organization.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 344, § 1, effective September 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 345, § 1, effective September 1, 2021.

16-111-6.
Expiration dates.

An educational entity, person, or vendor who or that donates food as permitted by law shall not be subject to civil or criminal liability or penalty for any violation of any laws, regulations, or ordinances regulating the labeling or packaging of the donated product or, with respect to any other laws, regulations, or ordinances, for a violation occurring after the time of donation. The donation of nonperishable food that is fit for human consumption but that has exceeded the labeled shelf life date recommended by the manufacturer is protected, pursuant to this section, if the entity, person, or vendor who or that distributes the food to the end recipient makes a good faith evaluation that the food to be donated is wholesome.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 344, § 1, effective September 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 345, § 1, effective September 1, 2021.

16-111-7.
Rules and regulations.

The commissioner is hereby authorized to promulgate whatever rules and regulations may be required to implement this chapter and shall annually provide notice to all educational entities of the department’s school waste disposal and refuse disposal policies.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 344, § 1, effective September 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 345, § 1, effective September 1, 2021.